dictionaries/mr_IN.aff
SFX A Y 335
SFX A 0 अंती .
SFX A 0 अर्थी .
SFX A 0 आतून .
SFX A 0 आतूनचा .
SFX A 0 आतूनची .
SFX A 0 आतूनचे .
SFX A 0 आतूनच्या .
SFX A 0 आतूनला .
SFX A 0 आधी .
SFX A 0 आधीचा .
SFX A 0 आधीची .
SFX A 0 आधीचे .
SFX A 0 आधीच्या .
SFX A 0 आधीला .
SFX A 0 उलट .
SFX A 0 उलटे .
SFX A 0 ऐवजी .
SFX A 0 ऐवजीचा .
SFX A 0 ऐवजीची .
SFX A 0 ऐवजीचे .
SFX A 0 ऐवजीच्या .
SFX A 0 ऐवजीला .
SFX A 0 कडचा .
SFX A 0 कडची .
SFX A 0 कडचे .
SFX A 0 कडच्या .
SFX A 0 कडला .
SFX A 0 कडून .
SFX A 0 कडूनचा .
SFX A 0 कडूनची .
SFX A 0 कडूनचे .
SFX A 0 कडूनच्या .
SFX A 0 कडूनला .
SFX A 0 कडं .
SFX A 0 कडे .
SFX A 0 कडेचा .
SFX A 0 कडेची .
SFX A 0 कडेचे .
SFX A 0 कडेच्या .
SFX A 0 कडेला .
SFX A 0 कडील .
SFX A 0 करवी .
SFX A 0 करिता .
SFX A 0 करिताचा .
SFX A 0 करिताची .
SFX A 0 करिताचे .
SFX A 0 करिताच्या .
SFX A 0 करिताला .
SFX A 0 करून .
SFX A 0 करूनचा .
SFX A 0 करूनची .
SFX A 0 करूनचे .
SFX A 0 करूनच्या .
SFX A 0 करूनला .
SFX A 0 कारणे .
SFX A 0 खालचा .
SFX A 0 खालची .
SFX A 0 खालचे .
SFX A 0 खालच्या .
SFX A 0 खालला .
SFX A 0 खाली .
SFX A 0 खालून .
SFX A 0 खालूनचा .
SFX A 0 खालूनची .
SFX A 0 खालूनचे .
SFX A 0 खालूनच्या .
SFX A 0 खालूनला .
SFX A 0 खेरीज .
SFX A 0 खेरीजचा .
SFX A 0 खेरीजची .
SFX A 0 खेरीजचे .
SFX A 0 खेरीजच्या .
SFX A 0 खेरीजला .
SFX A 0 च .
SFX A 0 चं .
SFX A 0 जवळ .
SFX A 0 जवळचा .
SFX A 0 जवळची .
SFX A 0 जवळचे .
SFX A 0 जवळच्या .
SFX A 0 जवळला .
SFX A 0 जागी .
SFX A 0 जोगा .
SFX A 0 जोगी .
SFX A 0 जोगे .
SFX A 0 ठायी .
SFX A 0 तम .
SFX A 0 तर .
SFX A 0 तलं .
SFX A 0 तला .
SFX A 0 तली .
SFX A 0 तले .
SFX A 0 तल्या .
SFX A 0 तील .
SFX A 0 तून .
SFX A 0 देखील .
SFX A 0 द्वारे .
SFX A 0 नंतर .
SFX A 0 नंतरचा .
SFX A 0 नंतरची .
SFX A 0 नंतरचे .
SFX A 0 नंतरच्या .
SFX A 0 नंतरला .
SFX A 0 नजीक .
SFX A 0 नजीकचा .
SFX A 0 नजीकची .
SFX A 0 नजीकचे .
SFX A 0 नजीकच्या .
SFX A 0 नजीकला .
SFX A 0 निमित्त .
SFX A 0 परता .
SFX A 0 परी .
SFX A 0 परीस .
SFX A 0 पर्यंत .
SFX A 0 पर्यंतचा .
SFX A 0 पर्यंतची .
SFX A 0 पर्यंतचे .
SFX A 0 पर्यंतच्या .
SFX A 0 पर्यंतला .
SFX A 0 पलीकडे .
SFX A 0 पाशी .
SFX A 0 पाशीचा .
SFX A 0 पाशीची .
SFX A 0 पाशीचे .
SFX A 0 पाशीच्या .
SFX A 0 पाशीला .
SFX A 0 पासून .
SFX A 0 पासूनचा .
SFX A 0 पासूनची .
SFX A 0 पासूनचे .
SFX A 0 पासूनच्या .
SFX A 0 पासूनला .
SFX A 0 पुढचा .
SFX A 0 पुढची .
SFX A 0 पुढचे .
SFX A 0 पुढच्या .
SFX A 0 पुढला .
SFX A 0 पुढून .
SFX A 0 पुढूनचा .
SFX A 0 पुढूनची .
SFX A 0 पुढूनचे .
SFX A 0 पुढूनच्या .
SFX A 0 पुढूनला .
SFX A 0 पुढे .
SFX A 0 पुढं .
SFX A 0 पुढील .
SFX A 0 पूर्वी .
SFX A 0 पूर्वीचा .
SFX A 0 पूर्वीची .
SFX A 0 पूर्वीचे .
SFX A 0 पूर्वीच्या .
SFX A 0 पूर्वीला .
SFX A 0 पेक्षा .
SFX A 0 पैकी .
SFX A 0 पैकीचा .
SFX A 0 पैकीची .
SFX A 0 पैकीचे .
SFX A 0 पैकीच्या .
SFX A 0 पैकीला .
SFX A 0 पोटी .
SFX A 0 पोटीचा .
SFX A 0 पोटीची .
SFX A 0 पोटीचे .
SFX A 0 पोटीच्या .
SFX A 0 पोटीला .
SFX A 0 प्रत .
SFX A 0 प्रती .
SFX A 0 प्रमाणं .
SFX A 0 प्रमाणे .
SFX A 0 प्रमाणेचा .
SFX A 0 प्रमाणेची .
SFX A 0 प्रमाणेचे .
SFX A 0 प्रमाणेच्या .
SFX A 0 प्रमाणेला .
SFX A 0 बदली .
SFX A 0 बदलीचा .
SFX A 0 बदलीची .
SFX A 0 बदलीचे .
SFX A 0 बदलीच्या .
SFX A 0 बदलीला .
SFX A 0 बद्दल .
SFX A 0 बद्दलचा .
SFX A 0 बद्दलची .
SFX A 0 बद्दलचे .
SFX A 0 बद्दलच्या .
SFX A 0 बद्दलला .
SFX A 0 बरोबर .
SFX A 0 बरोबरचा .
SFX A 0 बरोबरची .
SFX A 0 बरोबरचे .
SFX A 0 बरोबरच्या .
SFX A 0 बरोबरला .
SFX A 0 बाबत .
SFX A 0 बाहेर .
SFX A 0 भर .
SFX A 0 भोवती .
SFX A 0 भोवतीचा .
SFX A 0 भोवतीची .
SFX A 0 भोवतीचे .
SFX A 0 भोवतीच्या .
SFX A 0 भोवतीला .
SFX A 0 मधलं .
SFX A 0 मधला .
SFX A 0 मधली .
SFX A 0 मधले .
SFX A 0 मधल्या .
SFX A 0 मधील .
SFX A 0 मधून .
SFX A 0 मधूनचा .
SFX A 0 मधूनची .
SFX A 0 मधूनचे .
SFX A 0 मधूनच्या .
SFX A 0 मधूनला .
SFX A 0 मध्ये .
SFX A 0 मागचा .
SFX A 0 मागची .
SFX A 0 मागचे .
SFX A 0 मागच्या .
SFX A 0 मागला .
SFX A 0 मागील .
SFX A 0 मागून .
SFX A 0 मागूनचा .
SFX A 0 मागूनची .
SFX A 0 मागूनचे .
SFX A 0 मागूनच्या .
SFX A 0 मागूनला .
SFX A 0 मागे .
SFX A 0 मात्र .
SFX A 0 मुळे .
SFX A 0 मुळं .
SFX A 0 योगे .
SFX A 0 योग्य .
SFX A 0 लागी .
SFX A 0 वतीनं .
SFX A 0 वतीने .
SFX A 0 वर .
SFX A 0 वरचं .
SFX A 0 वरचा .
SFX A 0 वरची .
SFX A 0 वरचे .
SFX A 0 वरच्या .
SFX A 0 वरती .
SFX A 0 वरला .
SFX A 0 वरली .
SFX A 0 वरील .
SFX A 0 वरून .
SFX A 0 वरूनचा .
SFX A 0 वरूनची .
SFX A 0 वरूनचे .
SFX A 0 वरूनच्या .
SFX A 0 वरूनला .
SFX A 0 वाचून .
SFX A 0 वाचूनचा .
SFX A 0 वाचूनची .
SFX A 0 वाचूनचे .
SFX A 0 वाचूनच्या .
SFX A 0 वाचूनला .
SFX A 0 विना .
SFX A 0 विरुद्ध .
SFX A 0 विरुद्धचा .
SFX A 0 विरुद्धची .
SFX A 0 विरुद्धचे .
SFX A 0 विरुद्धच्या .
SFX A 0 विरुद्धला .
SFX A 0 विशी .
SFX A 0 विषयी .
SFX A 0 विषयीचा .
SFX A 0 विषयीची .
SFX A 0 विषयीचे .
SFX A 0 विषयीच्या .
SFX A 0 विषयीला .
SFX A 0 वीण .
SFX A 0 वेगळा .
SFX A 0 वेगळी .
SFX A 0 वेगळे .
SFX A 0 वेगळं .
SFX A 0 व्यतिरिक्त .
SFX A 0 शिवाय .
SFX A 0 शिवायचा .
SFX A 0 शिवायची .
SFX A 0 शिवायचे .
SFX A 0 शिवायच्या .
SFX A 0 शिवायला .
SFX A 0 संगे .
SFX A 0 संदर्भात .
SFX A 0 संबंधी .
SFX A 0 संबंधीचा .
SFX A 0 संबंधीची .
SFX A 0 संबंधीचे .
SFX A 0 संबंधीच्या .
SFX A 0 संबंधीला .
SFX A 0 सकट .
SFX A 0 सकटचा .
SFX A 0 सकटची .
SFX A 0 सकटचे .
SFX A 0 सकटच्या .
SFX A 0 सकटला .
SFX A 0 सम .
SFX A 0 समक्ष .
SFX A 0 समवेत .
SFX A 0 समान .
SFX A 0 समोर .
SFX A 0 समोरचा .
SFX A 0 समोरची .
SFX A 0 समोरचे .
SFX A 0 समोरच्या .
SFX A 0 समोरला .
SFX A 0 सवे .
SFX A 0 सह .
SFX A 0 सहित .
SFX A 0 साठी/Z .
SFX A 0 साठीचा .
SFX A 0 साठीची .
SFX A 0 साठीचे .
SFX A 0 साठीच्या .
SFX A 0 साठीला .
SFX A 0 सारखं .
SFX A 0 सारखा .
SFX A 0 सारखी .
SFX A 0 सारखे .
SFX A 0 सारख्या .
SFX A 0 स्तव .
SFX A 0 हाती .
SFX A 0 ही .
SFX A 0 इतका .
SFX A 0 इतकी .
SFX A 0 इतके .
SFX A 0 एवढा .
SFX A 0 एवढी .
SFX A 0 एवढे .
SFX A 0 करता .
SFX A 0 पुरता .
SFX A 0 पुरती .
SFX A 0 पुरते .
SFX A 0 पुरत्या .
